apertium-en-es.en.metadix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?><!-- -*-nxml-*- -->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>
  <!-- symbols -->
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="acr"          c="Acronym"/>
    <sdef n="predet"       c="Pre-determiner"/>
    <sdef n="detnt"        c="Determiner neuter(?)"/>
    <sdef n="loc"          c="Location (not locative!)"/>
    <sdef n="ant"          c="Anthroponym"/>
    <sdef n="al"           c="Other (altre)"/>
    <sdef n="cog"          c="Cognomen (family name)"/>
    <sdef n="atn"          c="Atonic"/>
    <sdef n="enc"          c="Enclitic"/>
    <sdef n="pro"          c="Proclitic"/>
    <sdef n="tn"           c="Tonic"/>
    <sdef n="n"            c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="np"           c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="adj"          c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="f"            c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="m"            c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="mf"           c="Masculine / feminine"/>
    <sdef n="sg"           c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl"           c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="adv"          c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"       c="Preadverb"/>
    <sdef n="pr"           c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="prn"          c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="rel"          c="Relative"/>
    <sdef n="nn"           c="Inanimate"/>
    <sdef n="an"           c="Animate / inanimate"/>
    <sdef n="aa"           c="Animate"/>
    <sdef n="ind"          c="Indefinite"/>
    <sdef n="itg"          c="Interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="det"          c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="dem"          c="Demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="def"          c="Definite"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"       c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"       c="Subordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"       c="Adverbial conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="nt"           c="Neuter"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"        c="Verb 'to be'"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"      c="Verb 'to have'"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"        c="Verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"        c="Modal verb"/>
    <sdef n="inf"          c="Infinitive"/>
    <sdef n="ger"          c="Gerund"/>
    <sdef n="pp"           c="Past participle"/>
    <sdef n="pri"          c="Present indicative"/>
    <sdef n="p1"           c="First person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"           c="Second person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"           c="Third person"/>
    <sdef n="pii"          c="Imperfect indicative"/>
    <sdef n="ifi"          c="Preterite indicative"/>
    <sdef n="fti"          c="Future indicative"/>
    <sdef n="cni"          c="Conditional"/>
    <sdef n="prs"          c="Present subjunctive"/>
    <sdef n="pis"          c="Imperative subjunctive"/>
    <sdef n="fts"          c="Future subjunctive"/>
    <sdef n="imp"          c="Imperative"/>
    <sdef n="pos"          c="Possessive"/>
    <sdef n="sp"           c="Singular / plural"/>
    <sdef n="ref"          c="Reflexive"/>
    <sdef n="sup"          c="Superlative"/>
    <sdef n="ord"          c="Ordinal"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"          c="Quantifier"/>
    <sdef n="num"          c="Numeral"/>
    <sdef n="pron"         c="Pronominal"/>
    <sdef n="ij"           c="Interjection"/>
    <sdef n="sent"         c="Sentence marker"/>
    <sdef n="cm"           c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"         c="Left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"         c="Right parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="lquest"       c="Left question mark"/>
    <sdef n="web"          c="URL address"/>
    <sdef n="apos"         c="Apostrophe"/>
    <sdef n="percent"      c="Percentage"/>
    <sdef n="time"         c="Time"/>
    <sdef n="guio"         c="Hyphen"/>
    <sdef n="past"         c="Past"/>
    <sdef n="sep"          c="Separable verb"/>
    <sdef n="sint"         c="Synthetic"/>
    <sdef n="email"        c="Email"/>
    <sdef n="obj"          c="Object"/>
    <sdef n="subj"         c="Subject"/>
    <sdef n="subs"         c="Substantive"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"         c="Present participle"/>
    <sdef n="url"          c="Web address"/>
    <sdef n="gen"          c="Genitive"/>
    <sdef n="vbdo"         c="The verb 'to do'"/>
    <sdef n="comp"         c="Comparative"/>
    <sdef n="pres"         c="Present tense (indicative)"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"         c="Auxiliary verb"/>
    <sdef n="ND"           c="Number to be determined"/>
    <sdef n="GD"           c="Gender to be determined"/>
    <sdef n="mon"          c="Currency / valuta"/>
  </sdefs>
  
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="anys">
      <e>
        <re>[MCDXLVI]+</re>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>   
    <pardef n="guionet">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-</l>
          <r>-<s n="guio"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="coma">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>,</l>
          <r>,<s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="aposchar">
      <e>
        <i>'</i>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" i="yes">
        <p>
          <l>’</l>
          <r>'</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cometa">
      <e>
        <par n="aposchar"/>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="apos"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?%</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p><l>£</l><r/></p>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9][0-9][0-9])*([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p><l>bn</l><r><s n="num"/><j/>billion<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><j/>pound<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p><l>$</l><r/></p> 
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9][0-9][0-9])*([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p><l>bn</l><r><s n="num"/><j/>billion<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><j/>dollar<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p>
      </e>	
      <e r="LR">
        <p><l>€</l><r/></p>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9][0-9][0-9])*([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p><l>bn</l><r><s n="num"/><j/>billion<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><j/>euro<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p><l>¥</l><r/></p> 
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9][0-9][0-9])*([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p><l>bn</l><r><s n="num"/><j/>billion<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><j/>yen<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p><l>£</l><r/></p>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9][0-9][0-9])*([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p><l>m</l><r><s n="num"/><j/>million<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><j/>pound<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p><l>$</l><r/></p>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9][0-9][0-9])*([.,][0-9]+)?k</re>
        <p><l>m</l><r><s n="num"/><j/>million<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><j/>dollar<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p><l>€</l><r/></p>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9][0-9][0-9])*([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p><l>m</l><r><s n="num"/><j/>million<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><j/>euro<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p><l>¥</l><r/></p> 
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9][0-9][0-9])*([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p><l>m</l><r><s n="num"/><j/>million<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><j/>yen<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separa">
      <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separ">
      <e>
        <re>[¿¡]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="lquest"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e>
        <re>[\(\[]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e>
        <re>[\)\]]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e>      <par n="anys"/>    </e>
    <e>      <par n="numeros"/>    </e>
    <e>      <par n="separa"/>    </e>
    <e>      <par n="coma"/>    </e>
    <e>      <par n="cometa"/>    </e>
    <e>      <par n="paresq"/>    </e>
    <e>      <par n="pardret"/>    </e>
    <e>      <par n="separ"/>    </e>
    <e>      <par n="guionet"/>    </e>
